Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-24] Disposition of receipts.
Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, all fees and other moneys
received by the director shall be deposited into the compliance resolution
fund. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next